Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS APPLYING TO HEALTH PROFESSIONS GENERALLY

CHAPTER 112. GENERAL LICENSING REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE

TO MULTIPLE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONERS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 112.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Health care practitioner" means an individual issued a license, certificate, registration, title, permit, or other authorization to engage in a health care profession.

(2) "Licensing entity" means a department, commission, board, office, authority, or other agency of the state that regulates activities and persons under this title.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2680), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 112.002. APPLICABILITY. This chapter applies only to licensing entities and health care practitioners under Chapters 401, 453, and 454 and Subtitles B, C, D, E, F, and K.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2680), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. SERVICES PROVIDED TO CHARITIES

Sec. 112.051. REDUCED LICENSE REQUIREMENTS FOR RETIRED HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONERS PERFORMING CHARITY WORK. (a) Each licensing entity shall adopt rules providing for reduced fees and continuing education requirements for a retired health care practitioner whose only practice is voluntary charity care.

(b) The licensing entity by rule shall define voluntary charity care.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2680), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.